Alaska, session 34, HB300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 39.20.160 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 05 (b) The commissioner of administration shall adopt regulations that set a 06 meals and incidental expense allowance for state officials and employees on official 07 travel in the state, prorated for partial days and by meal period in a manner determined 08 by the commissioner, as follows: 09 (1) at least $82 a day for the first 30 days; and 10 (2) at least $45 a day for the 31st day of travel until the travel is 11 completed. 12 (c) Beginning July 1, 2029, and every three years thereafter, the commissioner 13 of administration shall adjust the meals and incidental expense allowances in (b) of 14 this section by a percentage equal to the average percentage of increase over the 01 preceding three-year period in all items of the Consumer Price Index for all urban 02 consumers for urban Alaska, compiled by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States 03 Department of Labor. 04 (d) In this section, "meals and incidental expense allowance" means the 05 allowance provided to a traveler, as a part of the traveler's per diem allowance, to 06 cover the cost of meals and expenses, including discretionary gratuities. 07 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.